Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 60.
1982 INTEREST RATE CONTROL AMENDMENT (CONST., ART. 19, § 13, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 13, which was subsequently repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 89. Amendment 60 was proposed by H.J.R. No. 7 (see Acts 1981, p. 2374(iv)) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 30, 1981. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 2, 1982, by a vote of 442,325 for and 302,461 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 60 provided that the popular name for this amendment is “The 1982 Interest Rate Control Amendment.”